Georgia, session 2025_26, HB906.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
Long-term Care Ombudsman Program, is amended by revising Code Section 31-8-59,
relating to notice to residents, as follows:
"31-8-59.
(a) The state ombudsman shall prepare and distribute to each long-term care facility in the
state a written notice describing the long-term care ombudsman program and the procedure
to follow in making a complaint, including the address and telephone number of the state
ombudsman and community ombudsman, if any. The administrator shall give the written
notice required by this Code section subsection to each resident and his or her legally
H. B. 906
- 1 -

LC 60 0168
appointed guardian, if any, upon admission. The administrator shall also post such written
notice in conspicuous public places in the facility in accordance with procedures provided
by the state ombudsman and shall give such notice to any resident and his or her legally
appointed guardian, if any, who did not receive it upon admission. The failure to provide
the notices required by this Code section subsection shall be a ground upon which the
department may revoke any permit issued to a long-term care facility under Code Section
31-7-1 Article 1 of this chapter.
(b) Each individual long-term care facility which maintains a website shall post in a
prominent location on such website a link to the official website of the office of the state
long-term care ombudsman."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 906
- 2 -